Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-115
Prior adoptions.

No adoption heretofore lawfully made shall be affected by the enactment of sections 43-101 to 43-115, but such adoptions shall continue in effect and operation according to the terms thereof.

Laws 1943, c. 104, § 13, p. 352;

R.S.1943, § 43-115;

Laws 2022, LB741, § 29.